Wisconsin, session 2025, AB309.
do enact as follows:AB309,14Section 1. 256.35 (7) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB309,1,75256.35 (7) (c) 1. In this paragraph, “national crisis hotline” means the 6telephone or text access number “988,” or its successor, that is maintained under 7the federally administered program under 42 USC 290bb-36c.AB309,2,282. Any public safety answering point or dispatcher that transfers a caller to 1the national crisis hotline is immune from civil liability for any outcomes resulting 2from the transfer.AB309,2,533. Subdivision 2. does not apply if the injury claimed to have resulted from the 4transfer is the result of an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or 5willful or wanton misconduct by the dispatcher or public safety answering point.AB309,2,66